Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2609HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 935 Section 1. Section 321J.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Only a licensed physician, licensed physician assistant 3 as defined in section 148C.1 , paramedic if authorized by the 4 paramedicâs designated medical director, medical technologist, 5 or registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, medical 6 laboratory technician, phlebotomist, laboratory assistant, 7 or other qualified person, acting at the request of a peace 8 officer, may withdraw a specimen of blood for the purpose of 9 determining the alcohol concentration or the presence of a 10 controlled substance or other drugs. A person who withdraws 11 a specimen of blood in accordance with this subsection 12 shall act reasonably, in good faith, and in accordance with 13 standard medical procedures and applicable occupational 14 safety and health standards while withdrawing the specimen 15 of blood. However, any peace officer, using devices and 16 methods approved by the commissioner of public safety, may 17 take a specimen of a personâs breath or urine for the purpose 18 of determining the alcohol concentration, or may take a 19 specimen of a personâs urine for the purpose of determining 20 the presence of a controlled substance or other drugs. Except 21 in cases of negligence while withdrawing a specimen of blood, 22 a person authorized to withdraw a specimen of blood under 23 this subsection who acts reasonably, in good faith, and in 24 accordance with standard medical procedures and applicable 25 occupational safety and health standards, shall not be liable 26 in any civil or criminal action for the withdrawal of the 27 specimen. Only new equipment kept under strictly sanitary and 28 sterile conditions shall be used for drawing blood. 29